Connecticut, session 2026, SB00506.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 53a-115 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A person is guilty of criminal mischief in the first degree when: (1)
With intent to cause damage to tangible property of another and having
no reasonable ground to believe that such person has a right to do so,
such person damages tangible property of another in an amount
exceeding one thousand five hundred dollars, or (2) with intent to cause
(A) (i) damage to tangible property of another and having no reasonable
ground to believe that such person has a right to do so, or (ii) an
interruption or impairment of service rendered to the public, and
[having] (B) with no reasonable ground to believe that such person has
a right to do so, such person damages or tampers with tangible property
of a utility or mode of public transportation, power or communication,
and thereby causes an interruption or impairment of service rendered
SB506 / File No. 619 1

SB506 File No. 619
to the public, or (3) with intent to cause damage to any electronic
monitoring equipment owned or leased by the state or its agent and
required as a condition of probation or conditional discharge pursuant
to section 53a-30, as a condition of release pursuant to section 54-64a or
as a condition of community release pursuant to section 18-100c, and
having no reasonable ground to believe that such person has a right to
do so, such person damages such electronic monitoring equipment and
thereby causes an interruption in its ability to function, or (4) with intent
to cause (A) damage to tangible property of another and having no
reasonable ground to believe that such person has a right to do so, or (B)
an interruption or impairment of service rendered to the public and
having no reasonable ground to believe that such person has a right to
do so, such person damages or tampers with [(A)] (i) any tangible
property owned by the state, a municipality or a person for fire alarm or
police alarm purposes, [(B)] (ii) any telecommunication system operated
by the state police or a municipal police department, [(C)] (iii) any
emergency medical or fire service dispatching system, [(D)] (iv) any fire
suppression equipment owned by the state, a municipality, a person or
a fire district, or [(E)] (v) any fire hydrant or hydrant system owned by
the state or a municipality, a person, a fire district or a private water
company, or (5) with intent to cause damage to tangible property owned
by the state or a municipality that is located on public land and having
no reasonable ground to believe that such person has a right to do so,
such person damages such tangible property in an amount exceeding
one thousand five hundred dollars.
(b) Criminal mischief in the first degree is a class D felony.
Sec. 2. Section 53a-116 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A person is guilty of criminal mischief in the second degree when:
(1) With intent to cause damage to tangible property of another and
having no reasonable ground to believe that such person has a right to
do so, such person damages tangible property of another in an amount
exceeding two hundred fifty dollars; or (2) with intent to cause (A)
SB506 / File No. 619 2

SB506 File No. 619
damage to tangible property of another and having no reasonable
ground to believe that such person has a right to do so, or (B) an
interruption or impairment of service rendered to the public and having
no reasonable ground to believe that such person has a right to do so,
such person damages or tampers with tangible property of a public
utility or mode of public transportation, power or communication, and
thereby causes a risk of interruption or impairment of service rendered
to the public; or (3) with intent to cause damage to tangible property
owned by the state or a municipality that is located on public land and
having no reasonable ground to believe that such person has a right to
do so, such person damages such tangible property in an amount
exceeding two hundred fifty dollars.
(b) Criminal mischief in the second degree is a class A misdemeanor.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 53a-115
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 53a-116
JUD Joint Favorable
SB506 / File No. 619 3

SB506 File No. 619
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Correction, Dept.; Judicial Dept. GF - Potential Minimal Minimal
(Probation) Cost
Resources of the General Fund GF - Potential Minimal Minimal
Revenue Gain
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill expands the offenses of criminal mischief in the first and
second degrees, resulting in a potential cost to the Department of
Correction and the Judicial Department for incarceration or probation
and a potential revenue gain to the General Fund from fines.1 On
average, the marginal cost to the state for incarcerating an offender for
the year is $3,3002 while the average marginal cost for supervision in the
community is less than $6003 each year for adults and $450 each year for
juveniles.
The Out Years
Between FY 22 and FY 25, there were a total of 10,818 offenses recorded and $3,000
in fines collected under CGS §§ 53a-115 and 53a-116.
Inmate marginal cost is based on increased consumables (e.g., food, clothing, water,
sewage, living supplies, etc.) This does not include a change in staffing costs or utility
expenses because these expenses would only be realized if a unit or facility opened.
Probation marginal cost is based on services provided by private providers and only
includes costs that increase with each additional participant. This does not include a
cost for additional supervision by a probation officer unless a new offense is
anticipated to result in enough additional offenders to require additional probation
officers.
SB506 / File No. 619 4

SB506 File No. 619
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the number of offenses and fines
collected.
SB506 / File No. 619 5

SB506 File No. 619
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 506
AN ACT CONCERNING CRIMINAL PENALTIES FOR INTENTIONAL
DAMAGE TO CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE.